Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 830.575 is amended to read:
830.575. (1)  Notwithstanding ORS 830.790 (3), the annual fee for issuance and renewal of an
aquatic invasive species prevention permit for a sailboat that is at least  12 feet in length and not
registered in Oregon or a motorboat that is not registered in Oregon is [ $20] $30.
(2) All fees collected under this section  shall be deposited into the Aquatic Invasive Species
Prevention Fund established under ORS 830.585.
SECTION 2.  ORS 830.790 is amended to read:
830.790. (1) The biennial fee for the original or renewal certificate of number or registration  is:
(a) [ $5] $8 plus $5.95 per foot, or portion thereof, for all sailboats 12 feet in  length or more and
for all motorboats.
(b) $6, for boats that are assessed by the Department of Revenue  under ORS 308.505 to 308.674.
(c) $6, for amphibious vehicles that are licensed by the Department of Transportation.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, no fee is required for boats owned  by
eleemosynary organizations which are  operated primarily as a part of organized activities for the
purpose of teaching youths  scoutcraft, camping, seamanship, self-reliance, patriotism, courage and
kindred virtues.
(3) Except for the assessment referred to in subsection  (1)(b) of this section, the fees provided
by this section are in lieu of any other tax or license fee.
[(4) The operator of a boat livery holding five or more boats ready for hire  may pay a biennial
certificate of number fee of $90 plus $10 for each boat instead of the fee  otherwise provided in this
section.]
(4) Instead of the fee otherwise provided in this section,  the operator of a boat livery
holding five or more boats ready for hire may pay:
(a) A biennial certificate of number fee of $90; and
(b) A $13 fee for each boat.
(5) For each original  or renewal certificate fee collected under subsection (1)(a) of this section,
the State Marine Board shall deposit [ $5] $8  of  the amount collected into the Aquatic Invasive
Species Prevention Fund established under ORS 830.585.
Enrolled House Bill 2982 (HB 2982-A) Page 1
(6) For each original or  renewal certificate fee collected under subsection (4)(b) of this
section, the State Marine Board shall deposit $13 of the amount collected into the  Aquatic
Invasive Species Prevention Fund established under ORS 830.585.
SECTION 3.  ORS 830.627 is amended to read:
830.627. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 830.790 (3), fees for issuance of a waterway  access permit are
as follows:
(a) [ $5] $6 for a one-week permit.
(b) [ $17] $20 for an annual permit.
(c) [ $30] $35 for a biennial permit.
(d) The annual  fee for an operator of a boat livery that offers nonmotorized boats at least 10 feet
in length or sailboats at least 10 feet but less than 12 feet in length is:
(A) [ $90] $100 for an operator who owns 6 to 10 nonmotorized boats or sailboats.
(B) [ $165] $185 for an operator who owns 11 to 20 nonmotorized boats or sailboats.
(C) [ $300] $340 for an operator who owns 21 or more nonmotorized boats or sailboats.
(2) The State Marine Board shall deposit fees received under this section  into the Waterway
Access Fund established under ORS 830.615 as follows:
(a) $4 for every one-week permit fee paid.
(b) $12 for every annual permit fee paid.
(c) $20 for every biennial permit fee paid.
(d) $60 for every permit fee paid by an operator of a boat livery who owns 6 to 10 nonmotorized
boats or sailboats.
(e) $110 for every permit fee paid by an operator of a boat livery who owns  11 to 20 nonmo-
torized boats or sailboats.
(f) $200 for every permit fee paid  by an operator of a boat livery who owns 21 or more nonmo-
torized boats or sailboats.
(3) The board shall deposit fees received under this section into the Aquatic Invasive  Species
Prevention Fund established under ORS 830.585 as follows:
(a) [ $1] $2 for every one-week permit fee paid.
(b) [ $5] $8 for every annual permit fee paid.
(c) [ $10] $15 for every biennial permit fee paid.
(d) [ $30] $40 for every permit fee paid by an operator of a boat livery  who owns 6 to 10 non-
motorized boats or sailboats.
(e) [ $55] $75 for every permit fee paid by an operator of a boat livery who owns 11 to 20 non-
motorized boats or sailboats.
(f) [ $100] $140 for every permit fee  paid by an operator of a boat livery who owns 21 or more
nonmotorized boats or sailboats.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 830.624 is amended to read:
830.624. (1) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, a person 14 years of
age or  older shall carry a waterway access permit while operating a nonmotorized boat [ that is at
least 10 feet in length ] or a sailboat that is  [ at least 10 feet but ] less than 12 feet in length, in the
manner provided by  the State Marine Board by rule. The person shall present proof of a permit upon
request by a peace officer.
(2) A waterway access permit under this  section is transferrable to any nonmotorized boat [ that
is at least 10 feet in length ] or a sailboat that is [ at least 10 feet but ] less than 12 feet in length.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) Days that the board designates, by rule,  as free boating days and on which the board allows
individuals to operate a boat described in subsection  (1) of this section without holding an otherwise
required waterway access permit.
(b) A person operating a boat  owned by an operator of a boat livery if the operator of a boat
livery displays proof of holding a waterway access permit according to rules adopted by the board.
(c) A person operating a boat on a federally designated wild and scenic river for which a  sepa-
rate fee system is in place.
Enrolled House Bill 2982 (HB 2982-A) Page 2
(d) A person operating a boat if the person is engaged in law enforcement, public  safety or of-
ficial business of a federal, state or municipal agency, as defined by the board by rule.
(e) A resident of a bordering state who launches a boat from that  bordering state into bordering
waters, as defined by the board by rule.
(f) A person operating a boat if the person  holds a nonmotorized boating permit, a registration
or a similar authorization that is issued by another state and accepted by the board by rule.
(g) A person who is a member of a federally recognized Indian tribe in this  state and who is
engaged in tribal fishing or a tribal ceremony.
(h) Nonmotorized boats that are less than 10 feet in length that are:
(A) Engaged in whitewater recreation activities, as defined by the board by rule; and
(B) Operated on waters of this state identified by the board by rule.
(4) The board may adopt rules that  provide additional exemptions from the requirement to ob-
tain a permit under subsection (1) of this section.
Passed by House May 22, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 12, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2982 (HB 2982-A) Page 3